src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Dagbani language nouns inflect in cases.



LEXICON n1
+N+Sg:%>li # ;
+N+Pl:%>a # ;

LEXICON n2
+N+Sg:%>a # ;
+N+Pl:%>ba # ;

LEXICON n3
+N+Sg:%>ga # ;
+N+Pl:%>si # ;

LEXICON n4
+N+Sg:%>gu # ;
+N+Pl:%>ri # ;

LEXICON n5
+N+Sg:%>gu # ;
+N+Pl:%>a # ;

LEXICON n6 ! TODO: fix m/mm when examples.
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>a # ;



LEXICON Cases
# ; ! remove when not needed.

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
